Maryland, session 2025, SB0456.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
18–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Office” means the Office of Student Financial Assistance.
18–2404.
Each applicant for a Higher Education Loan Assistance Grant under this subtitle
shall:
(1) Be licensed to practice in Maryland by the State Board of Dental
Examiners;
(2) Demonstrate financial need;
– 1 –

Ch. 357 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) Be employed full time OR PART TIME as a dentist or dental hygienist;
(4) Agree that at least 30% of the patients treated by the dentist or in the
practice in which the dental hygienist works each year for a 3–year period in a private
practice or clinical setting will be Maryland Medical Assistance Program recipients; and
(5) Meet any other criteria established by the Office.
18–2405.
(a) The Office, on notification by the Maryland Department of Health, may award
Higher Education Loan Assistance Grants.
(b) The Office, in collaboration with the Maryland Department of Health, shall
adopt regulations to determine:
(1) The maximum number of participants in the Program each year;
(2) The maximum number of total participants in the Program; and
(3) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, the minimum and maximum
amount of a Higher Education Loan Assistance Grant awarded under this subtitle.
(c) (1) On or after October 1, 2023, the amount of a Higher Education Loan
Assistance Grant awarded under subsection (a) of this section:
(i) Shall be at least $50,000 per year for 3 years for a dentist; and
(ii) May not exceed $10,000 per year for 2 years for a dental
hygienist.
(2) The Office, in collaboration with the Maryland Department of Health,
shall periodically evaluate the minimum and maximum grant amounts determined under
subsection (b)(3) of this section.
(3) THE OFFICE, IN COLLABORATION WITH THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, SHALL ESTABLISH PRORATED HIGHER EDUCATION
LOAN ASSISTANCE GRANT AMOUNTS FOR PART–TIME DENTISTS AND PART–TIME
DENTAL HYGIENISTS.
18–2406.
Each recipient of a Higher Education Loan Assistance Grant under this subtitle may
hold the grant for up to 3 years if the recipient:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 357
(1) Continues to be employed full time OR PART TIME as a dentist or
dental hygienist; and
(2) Continues to treat Maryland Medical Assistance Program recipients as
at least 30% of all patients treated:
(i) By the dentist in a private practice or clinical setting authorized
under the Program; or
(ii) In the private practice or clinical setting in which the dental
hygienist works.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2025, the Maryland Insurance Administration shall:
(1) study whether dental insurance carriers are using an online
credentialing system, as defined in § 15–112 of the Insurance Article, to process uniform
credentialing forms; and
(2) report its findings and recommendations to the Senate Finance
Committee and the House Health and Government Operations Committee, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, including any recommendations to expand
utilization of an online credentialing system to process uniform credentialing forms among
dental insurance carriers.
SECTION 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 3 –